Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-111
National Guard; units; inspection.

Inspections of all units and equipment of the National Guard shall be made as required by United States law or regulation. The Adjutant General may make or order such additional inspections as he shall determine necessary.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 24, p. 663;

C.S.1929, § 55-130;

R.S.1943, § 55-113;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 9, p. 1584.